District of Columbia statutes.
34-1501.01

Policy findings.

The Council of the District of Columbia adopts the following policy findings in support of community renewable energy:

(1)

Local communities benefit from the deployment of tier one renewable energy in the District, and the Council hereby encourages the Department to establish programs that support development of such projects;

(2)

It is in the public interest that the Department encourages broad participation in District-based tier one renewable electric generation by District residents, not-for-profit entities, and for-profit entities through outreach efforts and programs in all 8 wards;

(3)

It is in the public interest that the Department enables the development and deployment of community renewable energy facilities for the following purposes:

(A)

To allow renters and low- to moderate-income retail electric customers to own interests in tier one renewable energy generating facilities;

(B)

To allow interests in tier one renewable energy generation facilities to be portable and transferrable;

(C)

To facilitate market entry for all potential subscribers, while prioritizing those persons most sensitive to market barriers; and

(D)

To encourage developers to promote participation by renters and low- to moderate-income retail electric customers; and

(4)

It is in the public interest for developers to encourage participation by renters and low- to moderate-income retail electric customers.

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 101a
as added Dec. 13, 2013, D.C. Law 20-47, § 2(b), 60 DCR 15138
This section is referenced in § 34-1434.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-47 added this section.